Hawaii statutes.
§150-24 Agricultural seed; labels.
Each container of agricultural seed that is sold or offered for sale within the
State for planting purposes shall bear or have attached, in a conspicuous
place, a plainly written or printed label or tag in the English language,
giving the following information:

(1) Commonly accepted name of the kind and variety,
or kind and the phrase "variety not stated" of each agricultural seed
component in excess of five per cent of the whole, and the percentage by weight
of each in the order of its predominance.

(2) Where more than one component is required to be
named, the words "mixture" or "mixed" for seed consisting
of more than one kind, or "blend" for seed consisting of more than
one variety of the same kind.

(3) Lot number or other lot identification.

(4) Percentage by weight of all weed seed.

(5) Name and approximate number of each kind of
noxious weed seed to the extent required by rules of the department.

(6) Percentage by weight of agricultural seed other
than those required to be named on the label.

(7) Percentage by weight of inert matter.

(8) For each named agricultural seed:

(A) The percentage of germination, exclusive
of hard seed;

(B) The percentage of hard seed, if present;
and

(C) The calendar month and year the test was
completed to determine the percentages.

Following (A) and (B), the additional statement,
"total germination and hard seed," may be stated if desired.

(9) Name and address of the person who labeled the
seed or who sells, offers, or exposes the seed for sale within the State.

The department, by rule, may require additional
information on the label or tag for agricultural seed that is packaged or
processed, such as pelleted or coated seed, and sold in specialized containers
such as packets, hermetically sealed containers, tapes, or any other innovative
method or container. [L 1945, c 90, pt of §2; RL 1955, §26-8; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §150-24; am L 1979, c 87, §2; am L 1987, c
164, §6; am L 1991, c 73, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next